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PRE-CHECK
1.DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM
(@ Check the warning lights and buzzer.

(1) Release parking brake lever.

(20 When the ignition switch is turned ON, check that
the ABS warning lights go on for 3 seconds.

(8) Check the BRAKE warning light lights up when the
ignition switch is turned ON and the light goes off
when the engine starts.

(4) When 120seconds have elapsed aftertheignition
switch was turned ON, depressing and releasing
the brake pedal continuously with full stroke 15-20
timeswithin 10secs., warning lightlights up and
buzzer sounds.

HINT:

If the indicator check result is not normal, proceed to trouble-
shooting for the ABS warning light circuit (See Pub. No.
RM616Eonpage Dl -395).

(b) Incaseofnotusinghand  —heldtester:
Check the DTC.
(1) Disconnectthe short pin from check connector.

(2) Using SST, connectterminals Tcand E ] ofcheck
connector or Tc and CG of DLCS.
SST 09843 -180200r09843 -18040
(83)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
(4) Read the DTC from the ABS warning light on the
combination meter.
HINT:
. Ifno code appears, inspectthe diagnostic circuitor ABS
warninglightcircuit (See Pub.No.RM6  16Eonpage
DI-3950rDI -28).
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. As an example, the blinking patterns for normal code and
codes 11 and 21 are shown on the left.
(6) Codes are explained in the code table on page
DI-24.
(6) After completing the check, disconnect terminals Tc
and E , and turn off the display.
If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time the low-
est numbered DTC will be displayed 1st.

(¢) In case of using hand-held tester:

Check the DTC.

(1) Hook up the hand-held tester to the DLCS.

(2) Read the DTC by following the prompts on the tes-
ter screen.

HINT:

Please refer to the hand-held tester operator’s manual for fur-
ther details.

(d) In case of not using hand-held tester:

Clear the DTC.

(1) Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E1 of check
connector or Tc and CG of DLC3 and remove the
short pin from check connector.

SST 09843-18020 or 09843-18040

(2)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(8) Clear the DTC stored in ECU by depressing the
brake pedal 8 or more times within 5 seconds.

(4) Check that the warning light shows the normal
code.

(5) Remove the SST from the terminals of check con-
nector or DLCS.

SST 09843 -180200r 09843 -18040
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(6) Connect the short pin to check connector.
HINT:

Disconnecting the battery cable during repairs will not erase the
DTC in the ECU.

(e) Incase of using hand
Clear the DTC.
(1)Hookupthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(2) Turntheignition switch ON.
(8) Operatethehand -heldtesterto erasethe codes.
(Seehand -heldtester operator’'s manual.)

—-heldtester:

(f) Reference:

Using break —out-boxandhand -heldtester, measurethe

ECU terminal values.

(1) Turntheignition switch OFF.

(2) Hookupthebreak -out-boxandhand -heldtester
to the vehicle.

(83)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(4) Read the ECU input/output values by following the
prompts on the tester screen.

. hand-heldtester has a”Snapshot”function. This records
the measured values and is effective in the diagnosis of
intermittent problems.

. Pleaserefertothehand -heldtester/break —out-boxop-
erator’s manual for further details.



DI-20

DIAGNOSTICS - ANTI-LOCKBRAKE SYSTEM

Check Connector

0

W=

Ts

F02201

0.13secs. 0. LS

Secs.

ON

OFF i

BR3904

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP

(RM793E)

2. SENSOR SIGNAL CHECK (TEST MODE)
HINT:
If the ignition switch is turned from ON to ACC or LOCK during
test mode, DTC will be erased.
(@) Incaseofnotusinghand  -heldtester:
Check the sensor signal.
(1) Turntheignition switch OFF.
(2) Using SST, connectterminals Tsand E ] ofcheck
connector.
SST 09843 -18020
(8) Start the engine.

(4) Check that the ABS warning light blinks.
HINT:
If the ABS warning light does not blink, inspect the ABS warning
lightcircuitand Tscircuit (See Pub. No. RM6 16Eonpage
DI-395, DI -406).
(5) Keep the venhicle in the stationary condition on the
flat place for 6 sec. or more.
(6) Shift the transfer lever in L4 position and turn the
Center diff. lock switch ON.
(7)  Shift the transfer lever back.
(8) Drive vehicle straight forward.
When driving the vehicle with the speed faster than
45 km/h (28 mph) for several seconds, check that
the ABS warning light comes off.
HINT:
There is a case that the sensor check is not completed if the ve-
hicle has its rear wheels spun or its steering wheel steered dur-
ing this check.
(9) Stop the vehicle.
(10) Check ABS warning light goes off when the rear diff.
lock indicator light lights up or flashes.
HINT:
While the rear diff. is being locked, ECU records DTC 48.
(11) Using SST, connectterminals Tcand E ] ofcheck
connector or Tc and CG of DLCS.
SST 09843 -180200r09843 -18040
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(12) Read the number of blinks of the ABS warning light.

HINT:

S See the list of DTC on the next page.

S If every sensor is normal, a normal code is output (A cycle
of 0.25 secs. ON and 0.25 secs. OFF is repeated).

S If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time,
the lowest numbered code will be displayed 1st.

Malfunction Code (Example Code 72, 76)
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(13) After doing the check, disconnect the SST from ter-
minals of check connector or terminals of check
connector and DLC3, and turn the ignition switch
OFF.

SST 09843-18020 or 09843-18040

(b) In case of using hand-held tester:

ZalEmRN\ Check the sensor signal.

%“- (1) Hook up the hand-held tester to the DLC3.
EXN__Y) Hand-held

b‘, (2) Do step (3) to (9) on the previous and this page.
) Tester (3) Readthe DTC by following the prompts on the tes-
ter screen.
HINT:
Please refer to the hand—held tester operator’s manual for fur-
DLC3 ther details.
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DTC of the sensor check function:

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area

SRight front speed sensor
C1271/71 Low output voltage of right front speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

SLeft front speed sensor
C1272/72 Low output voltage of left front speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

SRight rear speed sensor
C1273/73 Low output voltage of right rear speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

SLeft rear speed sensor
C1274 /74 Low output voltage of left rear speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor

Abnormal change in output voltage of right front speed

C1275/75 Right front speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of left front speed
C1276 /76 Left front speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of right rear speed )
C1277177 Right rear speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of left rear speed
C1278/78 Left rear speed sensor rotor
sensor
) . SDeceleration sensor
C1279/79 Deceleration sensor is faulty . .
SSensor installation
C1282/ 82 Center differential lock position switch malfunction Center differential lock position switch
C1282 /83 L4 position switch malfunction L4 position switch

3. DECELERATION SENSOR OPERATION DIAGNOSIS
SYSTEM

CAUTION:

While checking the deceleration sensor operating diagno-

sis system, ABS does not work and brake system works as

a conventional brake system.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM793E)
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4. DECELERATION SENSOR CHECK

(@) Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.

(b) Connect VGS terminal to the batteries’ positive (+) termi-
nal, and GGND terminal to the batteries’ negative (-) ter-
minal, apply about 4.5 V between VGS and GGND termi-
nals.

NOTICE:

Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VGS and

GGND.

(c) Check the output voltage of GL1 terminals.

Symbols Condition Standard Value
GL1 Horizontal About 2.3V
GL1 Lean forward 0.4V -about 2.3V
GL1 Lean rearward About2.3V-4.1V

HINT:

S Ifthe sensor is tilted too much it may show the wrong val-

ue.

If dropped, the sensor should be replaced with a new one.
The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be
placed upside down.



